Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 2. Jitneys

§ 841.
Compulsory liability insurance or a surety bond.

Before a jitney is used in the carrying of passengers for hire, the owner thereof shall procure a contract or policy of insurance issued by a liability insurance company authorized to transact business in this State, or a surety bond executed by such owner and having a surety company authorized to transact business in this State as surety thereon, which insurance or surety bond shall indemnify the insured against any legal liability to the passengers in the jitney or others, for personal injury, the death of a person, or property damage, which injury, death, or damage may result from or have been caused by the use or operation of a motor vehicle covered by such policy of insurance or such bond.

§ 842.
Insurer or surety as co-defendant.

The insurer or surety may be made co-defendant with the owner of such jitney in an action for such injury, death, or property damage.

§ 843.
Amount of insurance or bond.

The amount of insurance or bond shall be a minimum of $50,000.00 for injury to or death of any one person in any crash subject to a minimum limit per crash of $100,000.00 for injuries to or death of all persons in any one crash if the vehicle has a seating capacity of seven passengers or less, subject to a minimum limit per crash of $250,000.00 for injuries to or death of all persons in any one crash if the vehicle has a seating capacity from eight to 12 passengers inclusive, subject to a minimum limit per crash of $300,000.00 for injuries to or death of all persons in any one crash if the vehicle has a seating capacity from 13 to 20 passengers inclusive, subject to a minimum limit per crash of $350,000.00 for injuries to or death of all persons in any one crash if the vehicle has a seating capacity from 21 to 30 passengers inclusive, subject to a minimum limit per crash of $300,000.00 for injuries to or death of all persons in any one crash if the vehicle has a seating capacity exceeding 30 passengers, and $50,000.00 from damages to property in any crash.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 109

, § 1;

1981, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1983.

§§ 844-848.
Repealed. 1995, No. 112 (Adj. Sess.), § 16.